Maryland, session 2026, SB0024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
13–517.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 1 –

Ch. 92 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) “AED COORDINATOR” MEANS THE INDIVIDUAL DESIGNATED BY A
REGISTERED ENTITY TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SECTION.
[(2)] (3) “Automated external defibrillator (AED)” means a medical heart
monitor and defibrillator device that:
(i) Is cleared for market by the [federal] U.S. Food and Drug
Administration;
(ii) Recognizes the presence or absence of ventricular fibrillation or
rapid ventricular tachycardia;
(iii) Determines, without intervention by an operator, whether
defibrillation should be performed;
(iv) On determining that defibrillation should be performed,
automatically charges; and
(v) 1. Requires operator intervention to deliver the electrical
impulse; or
2. Automatically continues with delivery of electrical
impulse.
[(3)] (4) “Certificate” means a certificate issued by the EMS Board to a
registered [facility] ENTITY.
[(4) (i)] (5) [“Facility”] “ENTITY” means AN ORGANIZATION, A
BUSINESS, AN ASSOCIATION, an agency, [an association,] a corporation, a firm, OR a
partnership[, or any other entity] IN THE STATE.
[(ii) “Facility” does not include a grocery store or restaurant that is
subject to § 21–330.3 of the Health – General Article.]
[(5)] (6) “Jurisdictional emergency medical services operational program”
means the institution, agency, corporation, or other entity that has been approved by the
EMS Board to provide oversight of emergency medical services for each of the local
government and State and federal emergency medical services programs.
(7) “LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
2–101 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
[(6)] (8) “Program” means the Public Access Automated External
Defibrillator Program.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 92
[(7) “Regional administrator” means the individual employed by the
Institute as regional administrator in each EMS region.
(8) “Regional council” means an EMS advisory body as created by the Code
of Maryland Regulations 30.05.
(9) “Regional council AED committee” means a committee appointed by the
regional council consisting of:
(i) The regional medical director;
(ii) The regional administrator; and
(iii) Three or more individuals with knowledge of and expertise in
AEDs.]
[(10)] (9) “Registered [facility”] ENTITY” means an [organization, a
business association, an agency, or any other] entity that meets the requirements of the
EMS Board for registering with the Program.
(b) (1) There is a Public Access Automated External Defibrillator Program.
(2) The purpose of the Program is to:
(i) Coordinate an effective statewide public access defibrillation
program; and
(ii) Implement the initiative to co–locate naloxone with automated
external defibrillators placed in public buildings, as required under § 13–518 of this
subtitle.
(3) The Program shall be administered by the EMS Board.
(c) The EMS Board may:
(1) Adopt regulations for the administration of the Program;
(2) Issue and renew certificates to [facilities] ENTITIES that meet the
requirements of this section;
(3) Deny, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the certificate of a registered
[facility] ENTITY for failure to meet the requirements of this section;
(4) Approve educational and training programs required under this section
that:
– 3 –

Ch. 92 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) Are conducted by any private or public entity; AND
(ii) [Include training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and
automated external defibrillation; and
(iii)] May include courses from nationally recognized [entities]
ORGANIZATIONS such as the American Heart Association, the American Red Cross, and
the National Safety Council; AND
[(5) Approve the protocol for the use of an AED; and]
[(6)] (5) Delegate to the Institute any portion of its authority under this
section.
(d) (1) [Each facility] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, EACH ENTITY that desires to make automated external defibrillation
available shall possess a valid certificate from the EMS Board.
(2) This subsection does not apply to:
(i) A jurisdictional emergency medical services operational
program;
(ii) A licensed commercial ambulance service;
(iii) A health care facility as defined in § 19–114 of the
Health – General Article; or
(iv) A place of business for health care practitioners who are licensed
as dentists under Title 4 of the Health Occupations Article or as physicians under Title 14
of the Health Occupations Article and are authorized to use an AED in accordance with
that license.
(3) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO OBTAIN
A CERTIFICATE FOR AN AED DEPLOYED IN A PATROL VEHICLE OF THE LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY.
(e) (1) To EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, TO qualify for AND RETAIN a certificate [a facility] AN ENTITY shall:
(1) (I) [Comply with the written protocol approved by the EMS Board]
HAVE A WRITTEN PLAN for the use of an AED [which] THAT includes [notification of] A
REQUIREMENT THAT THE ENTITY NOTIFY the emergency medical services system
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 92
through the use of the 911 universal emergency access number as soon as possible on the
use of an AED;
(2) (II) Have established [automated external defibrillator] AED
maintenance, placement, operation, AND reporting[, and quality improvement] procedures
as required by the EMS Board;
(3) (III) [Maintain] REQUIRE THE AED COORDINATOR TO MAINTAIN
THE FUNCTIONALITY OF each AED and all related equipment and supplies in accordance
with the standards established by the device manufacturer and the [federal] U.S. Food
and Drug Administration;
[(4) Ensure that each individual who is expected to operate an AED for the
registered facility has successfully completed an educational training course and refresher
training as required by the EMS Board; and]
(4) (IV) REQUIRE THE AED COORDINATOR TO PROMOTE
AWARENESS OF THE LOCATION AND OPERATION OF THE AED AMONG POTENTIAL
OR FORESEEABLE AED OPERATORS IN CASE OF EMERGENCY; AND
(5) (V) If the [facility] ENTITY is a public building, meet any
requirements established under § 13–518 of this subtitle relating to the co–location of
naloxone with each AED maintained [in] BY the [facility] ENTITY.
(2) FOR AN ENTITY THAT IS A GROCERY STORE OR RESTAURANT, TO
QUALIFY FOR AND RETAIN A CERTIFICATE, THE ENTITY SHALL:
(I) REGISTER THE NAME OF THE ENTITY WITH THE PROGRAM;
AND
(II) MAINTAIN THE FUNCTIONALITY OF EACH AED AND ALL
RELATED EQUIPMENT AND SUPPLIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE STANDARDS
ESTABLISHED BY THE DEVICE MANUFACTURER AND THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION.
(f) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED IN THIS SECTION,
AN ENTITY OTHER THAN A GROCERY STORE OR RESTAURANT THAT IS SUBJECT TO §
21–330.3 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE SHALL ENSURE THAT THE AED
COORDINATOR HAS SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETED AN EDUCATIONAL TRAINING
COURSE AND ANY REFRESHER TRAINING COURSES AS REQUIRED BY THE EMS
BOARD.
– 5 –

Ch. 92 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(G) A registered [facility] ENTITY shall report the use of an AED to the Institute
[for review by the regional council AED committee] USING THE FORM PROVIDED BY THE
INSTITUTE.
[(g)] (H) [A facility] AN ENTITY that desires to [establish] OBTAIN or renew a
certificate shall:
(1) Submit an application on the form that the EMS Board requires; and
(2) Meet the requirements under this section.
[(h)] (I) (1) The EMS Board shall issue a new or a renewed certificate to [a
facility] AN ENTITY that meets the requirements of this section.
(2) Each certificate shall include:
(i) The type of certificate;
(ii) The full name and address of the [facility] ENTITY;
(iii) A unique identification number; and
(iv) The dates of issuance and expiration of the certificate.
(3) A certificate is valid for 3 years.
[(i)] (J) The EMS Board may issue a cease and desist order or obtain injunctive
relief if [a facility] AN ENTITY makes automated external defibrillation available in
violation of this section.
[(j)] (K) (1) In addition to any other immunities available under statutory or
common law, a registered [facility] ENTITY is not civilly liable for any act or omission in
the provision of automated external defibrillation if the registered [facility] ENTITY:
(i) Has satisfied the requirements for making [automated external
defibrillation] AN AED available under this section; and
(ii) Possesses a valid certificate at the time of the act or omission.
[(2) In addition to any other immunities available under statutory or
common law, a member of the regional council AED committee is not civilly liable for any
act or omission in the provision of automated external defibrillation.]
[(3)] (2) In addition to any other immunities available under statutory or
common law, an individual is not civilly liable for any act or omission if:
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 92
(i) The individual is acting in good faith while rendering automated
external defibrillation to a person who is a victim or reasonably believed by the individual
to be a victim of a sudden cardiac arrest;
(ii) The assistance or aid is provided in a reasonably prudent
manner; and
(iii) The automated external defibrillation is provided without fee or
other compensation.
[(4)] (3) The immunities in this subsection are not available if the conduct
of the registered [facility] ENTITY or an individual amounts to gross negligence, willful or
wanton misconduct, or intentionally tortious conduct.
[(5)] (4) This subsection does not affect, and may not be construed as
affecting, any immunities from civil or criminal liability or defenses established by any
other provision of the Code or by common law to which a registered [facility, a member of
the regional council AED committee,] ENTITY or an individual may be entitled.
[(k)] (L) (1) A registered [facility] ENTITY aggrieved by a decision of the
Institute acting under the delegated authority of the EMS Board under this section shall
be afforded an opportunity for a hearing before the EMS Board.
(2) A registered [facility] ENTITY aggrieved by a decision of the EMS
Board under this section shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with
Title 10, Subtitle 2 of the State Government Article.
Article – Health – General
21–330.3.
(c) [Beginning January 1, 2025, each] EACH owner and operator of a grocery
store or restaurant shall:
(1) Place an automated external defibrillator in a prominent area,
accessible to employees and customers; and
[(2) Maintain the functionality of the automated external defibrillator.;
AND]
(2) (3) COMPLY WITH THE APPLICABLE REQUIREMENTS OF THE
PUBLIC ACCESS AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATOR PROGRAM PROVIDED
UNDER § 13–517 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
– 7 –

Ch. 92 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – Public Safety
2–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) (1) “Law enforcement agency” means a law enforcement agency of a
department, county, or municipal corporation of the State.
(2) “Law enforcement agency” includes:
(i) sheriffs; and
(ii) similar agencies of other states and the United States.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 8 –